Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-105.01
Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy; purpose.

It is the purpose of the Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy to protect the welfare of the citizens of the state by assuring the competency of persons regulated under the Public Accountancy Act through (1) administration of certified public accountant examinations, (2) issuance of certificates and permits to qualified persons and firms, (3) monitoring the requirements for continued issuance of certificates and permits, and (4) disciplining certificate and permit holders who fail to comply with the technical or ethical standards of the public accountancy profession.

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 2.

The rules of the Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy allow the board to both restrict advertising and require the use of a disclaimer by inactive registrants. Walsh v. State, 276 Neb. 1034, 759 N.W.2d 100 (2009).

The Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy may use its rulemaking authority under section 1-112 to promulgate standards and procedures whereby the character and fitness of an applicant for initial certification may be considered by the board in determining whether the applicant is a qualified person under this section. Troshynski v. Nebraska State Bd. of Pub. Accountancy, 270 Neb. 347, 701 N.W.2d 379 (2005).